Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3806
Ward of department; special immigrant juvenile status; documentation.

If a court makes a foreign national minor or a minor having multiple nationalities a ward of the department and the minor has become eligible for special immigrant juvenile status as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(27)(J), the consulate will assist the department in obtaining the necessary documentation for completion of the application for special immigrant juvenile status.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 6.